Tennessee, session 114, SB1653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-8-307(e), is amended by deleting
"three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000)" and substituting "five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000)" and by deleting "one million dollars ($1,000,000)" and substituting "one million five
hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1653
010389
- 1 -